Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 3. GUARDIANSHIP AND RELATED PROCEDURES

SUBTITLE E. ADMINISTRATION OF GUARDIANSHIP

CHAPTER 1164. LIABILITY OF GUARDIAN OR GUARDIANSHIP PROGRAM

Sec. 1164.001. LIABILITY OF GUARDIAN. A person is not liable to a third person solely because the person has been appointed guardian of a ward under this title.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1164.002. IMMUNITY OF GUARDIANSHIP PROGRAM. A guardianship program is not liable for civil damages arising from an action taken or omission made by a person while providing guardianship services to a ward on behalf of the guardianship program, unless the action or omission was:

(1) wilfully wrongful;

(2) taken or made:

(A) with conscious indifference to or reckless disregard for the safety of the ward or another;

(B) in bad faith; or

(C) with malice; or

(3) grossly negligent.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.